Tennessee, session 114, HB1143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-2401, is amended by deleting
"Clean energy" in subdivision (1) and substituting "Clean or green energy".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-2401, is amended by deleting
subdivision (3) and substituting:
(3) "Public utility" means:
(A) An entity subject to the jurisdiction of the Tennessee board of utility
regulation, in accordance with § 7-82-702; or
(B) A county-owned or municipal-owned utility that provides electric,
broadband, natural gas, or propane services to the public; and
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-2403, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
7-51-2403. Permissible sources of clean or green energy or renewable energy.
(a) A political subdivision that through ordinance, resolution, or other regulation
imposes requirements or expectations related to the source of clean or green energy or
renewable energy used by a public utility shall include the following as permissible
sources:
(1) Solar energy;
(2) Photovoltaic cells and panels;
(3) Hydropower;
HB1143
002365
- 1 -

(4) Wind power;
(5) Hydrogen fuel;
(6) Nuclear power;
(7) Natural gas;
(8) Fuel cells;
(9) Energy from waste-to-energy facilities;
(10) Energy storage systems or technologies;
(11) Geothermal energy;
(12) Dedicated crops grown for energy production;
(13) Industrial byproduct technologies that use fuel or energy that is a
byproduct of an industrial process;
(14) Waste heat recovery from capturing and reusing the waste heat in
an industrial process for heating or generating mechanical or electric work;
(15) Combined heat and power systems;
(16) Pumped storage hydropower;
(17) Compressed air energy storage;
(18) Biomass, including agricultural crops, wastes, or residues, wood or
wood waste, animal waste or other animal byproducts, algae, or solid waste; and
(19) Renewable natural gas, as defined in § 65-5-114.
(b) A public utility required by a political subdivision to implement or comply with
requirements or expectations related to the source of clean or green energy or
renewable energy used by the public utility meets the requirement if the public utility
uses one (1) or more of the sources listed in subdivisions (a)(1)-(19), regardless of
whether the political subdivision classifies the requirements or expectations as relating
solely to clean or green energy or solely to renewable energy.
- 2 - 002365

(c) An ordinance, resolution, or other regulation in violation of this section is
against public policy and void.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-2404, is amended by deleting
the section.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 5-6-119(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (2) and substituting:
(2) "Energy project" means energy infrastructure improvements, whether
composed of real or personal property, or both, for clean or green energy or renewable
energy as those terms are defined in § 7-51-2401, including all sources listed in § 7-51-
2403; and
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 6-54-148(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (1) and substituting:
(1) "Energy project" means energy infrastructure improvements, whether
composed of real or personal property, or both, for clean or green energy or renewable
energy as those terms are defined in § 7-51-2401, including all sources listed in § 7-51-
2403; and
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-51-2405, is amended by deleting
the section.
SECTION 8. The headings in this act are for reference purposes only and do not
constitute a part of the law enacted by this act. However, the code commission is requested to
include the headings in any compilation or publication containing this act.
SECTION 9. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 002365